Hawaii, session 2026, SB3266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $13,330,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary, and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the ninth senatorial district, as follows: 1.   Aina Haina Elementary A.   Electrical update of campus. Total funding                           $900,000 B.   Air-conditioning for classrooms and staff meeting areas. Total funding                           $300,000 C.   Multipurpose office and health room. Construction                  $1,500,000 Total funding                         $1,500,000 2.   Waikiki Elementary A.   New multipurpose building, ground and site improvements, and equipment and appurtenances. Design and construction       $9,450,000 Total funding                         $9,450,000 B.   Covered canopy for school play‑court. Total funding                         $1,180,000 SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital improvement projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________